Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1502.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-622.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-622.01. Unlawful flight from pursuing law enforcement vehicle; violation; classification; marked and unmarked vehicles; reckless endangerment a. A driver of a motor vehicle who wilfully flees or attempts to elude a pursuing official law enforcement vehicle is guilty of a class 5 felony if the law enforcement vehicle is either: 1. Being operated in the manner described in section 28-624, subsection C and is appropriately marked to show that it is an official law enforcement vehicle. 2. Unmarked and either of the following applies: (a) The driver admits to knowing that the vehicle was an official law enforcement vehicle. (b) Evidence shows that the driver knew that the vehicle was an official law enforcement vehicle. B. A driver of a motor vehicle is guilty of a class 4 felony if the driver violates subsection a of this section and the driver operates the motor VEHICLE in a manner that recklessly endangers the life of another person while fleeing or attempting to elude a PURSUING OFFICIAL law enforcement vehicle. c. A driver of a motor vehicle is guilty of a class 2 felony if the driver violates subsection a of this section and any of the following applies: 1. the driver caused serious physical injury as defined in section 13-105 to another person. 2. the motor vehicle was transporting a minor who is under fifteen years of age. 3. the driver of the MOTOR vehicle is found guilty of a violation of section 28-1381 or 28-1382. END_STATUTE